Louisiana, session 2026, HB335.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:233.4(A), (C)(introductory paragraph), and (D) are hereby and
amended and reenacted and R.S. 46:233.4(C)(4), (G), (H), (I), and (J) are hereby enacted to
read as follows:
§233.4. Verification of citizenship of applicants for public benefits
A. Except as prohibited by federal law, a state agency, or political
subdivision, or any entity administering federal, state, or local public benefits shall
verify that each applicant who applies for federal, state, or local public benefit
benefits is a person who has been recognized as a citizen of the United States by
birthright, naturalization, or any other method provided for under applicable federal
law or has satisfactory immigration status as a qualified alien as defined in 8 U.S.C.
1641(b).
* * *
C. Upon the termination of any reasonable opportunity period to verify
citizenship status, or upon receipt of a final verification that indicates that the
applicant is not a United States citizen or lacks satisfactory immigration status and
has entered the United States without inspection or admission, or has remained
beyond the expiration of his authorized period of stay, the state agency or political
subdivision shall:
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 335 ENROLLED
(4) Be subject to audit by the legislative auditor.
D. A state agency, or political subdivision, or any entity administering that
administers federal or state public benefits shall report at the end of each fiscal year
to the president of the Senate, speaker of the House of Representatives, governor,
and David R. Poynter Legislative Research Library on the results of the citizenship
verification requirements of this Section. The report shall include but not be limited
to the number of individuals reported to United States Immigration and Customs
Enforcement and the number of individuals who had public assistance terminated in
accordance with this Section.
* * *
G. This Section does not apply to the distribution of food or incentives for
food by organizations, farmers' markets, farm stands, or by nonprofit organizations.
H.(1) Except as provided in this Subsection, the provisions of this Section
shall not apply to any entity providing services for domestic abuse, sexual assault,
sexual harassment, human trafficking, homelessness, disaster response, or pregnancy
assistance, including but not limited to shelters, crisis centers, and nonprofit service
providers.
(2) The entities shall not be required to report any individual to the United
States Immigration and Customs Enforcement solely on the basis of inability to
verify citizenship or immigration status.
(3) The entities shall do all of the following:
(a) Request proof of citizenship or qualified immigration as required by this
Section.
(b) Maintain a record indicating whether proof of citizenship or qualified
immigration was provided.
(c) Maintain a record indicating whether services or benefits were continued
or discontinued based on proof of citizenship or qualified immigration.
(d) Maintain any other data points required by rule or necessary for audit by
the legislative auditor.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 335 ENROLLED
(4) The records described in this Subsection shall constitute the only
information required to be produced to the legislative auditor for compliance with
this Section.
(5) Notwithstanding Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, if the United States
Immigration and Customs Enforcement submits a lawful request for information
regarding an individual who failed to provide proof of citizenship or qualified
immigration status, the entity shall provide the information in accordance with
applicable federal and state law.
(6) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to prohibit cooperation with
federal authorities when otherwise required by law.
I. This Section shall not apply, and no entity shall be subject to liability or
enforcement under this Section, for actions taken in good faith to protect life, health,
safety, or access to essential services during emergent circumstances, disaster
response, post-disaster recovery, and public health operations.
J. This Section shall not apply to healthcare providers who provide services
to Medicaid recipients.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.